District of Columbia statutes.
38-2971.02

Repealed

Cost-of-construction adjustment for the Fund attributable to District of Columbia Public School capital budgets.

Repealed.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 102, 53 DCR 2843
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1010(b), 54 DCR 4102
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 4042(a), 54 DCR 7052
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4042(a) of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
Short title: Section 4041 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle E of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Public Education Reform Conforming Amendments Act of 2007”.